Illinois, session 104th, HB3893.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 1 5OPERATIONAL EXPENSES 6    Section 5. In addition to other amounts appropriated, the 7amount of $17,725,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary, 8respectively, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 9the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for 10operational expenses, awards, grants and permanent 11improvements for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, 12including prior years' costs. 13    Section 10. The following named amounts, or so much 14thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 15the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:16GENERAL ADMINISTRATION17OPERATIONS18Payable from the Tourism Promotion Fund: 19  For ordinary and contingent expenses associated20   with general administration, grants and 21   including prior years' costs....................10,000,00022Payable from the Intra-Agency Services Fund:   HB3893- 2 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  For overhead costs related to federal2   programs, including prior years' costs......... 18,689,2003Payable from the Build Illinois Bond Fund: 4  For ordinary and contingent expenses associated5   with the administration of the capital program,6   including prior years' costs.....................5,000,0007Payable from the General Revenue Fund:8  For costs associated with a feasibility study9   for projects under the Public-Private10   Partnership for Civic and Transit11   Infrastructure Project Act, in consultation12   with the Governor's Office13   of Management and Budget...........................650,00014  For ordinary and contingent expenses15   associated with general administration and16   operational expenses...............................500,000 17    Section 15. The sum of $5,500,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 19Commerce and Economic Opportunity from the General Revenue 20Fund for the ordinary and contingent expenses associated with 21the Office of Grants Management, including prior years' costs. 22    Section 20. The sum of $76,000,000, or so much thereof as 23may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 24Commerce and Economic Opportunity from the Cannabis Business   HB3893- 3 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1Development Fund for administrative costs, awards, loans and 2grants Pursuant to Section 7-10 and Section 7-15 of the 3Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 4    Section 25. The sum of $2,060,100 or so much thereof as may 5be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Commerce 6and Economic Opportunity from the Cannabis Regulation Fund for 7administrative costs, awards and grants for technical 8assistance pursuant to the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 9    Section 30. The following named amounts, or so much 10thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 11the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:12OFFICE OF TOURISM13OPERATIONS14Payable from the Tourism Promotion Fund: 15  For administrative expenses and grants16   for the tourism program, including17   prior years' costs...............................4,910,20018Payable from the Tourism Promotion Fund:19  For grants, contracts, and administrative expenses20   associated with outdoor recreation, including21   prior years' costs...............................2,500,00022  For grants, contracts, and administrative expenses 23   associated with advertising and promoting Illinois 24   Tourism in domestic and international   HB3893- 4 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1   markets, including prior years' costs...........44,000,0002    Total                                         $51,410,200 3    Section 35. The following named amounts, or so much 4thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 5the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:6OFFICE OF TOURISM7GRANTS8Payable from the International Tourism Fund: 9  For Grants, Contracts and Administrative Expenses 10   Associated with the International Tourism Program 11   Pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/605-707, including prior 12   years' costs.....................................4,000,00013Payable from the Tourism Promotion Fund: 14  For the Tourism Attraction Development 15   Grant Program Pursuant to 20 ILCS 665/8a.........1,800,00016  For Purposes Pursuant to the Illinois 17   Promotion Act, 20 ILCS 665/4a-1 to 18   Match Funds from Sources in the Private 19   Sector.............................................600,00020  For the Tourism Matching Grant Program 21   Pursuant to 20 ILCS 665/8-1 for 22   Counties under 1,000,000.........................1,250,00023  For the Tourism Matching Grant Program 24   Pursuant to 20 ILCS 665/8-1 for 25   Counties over 1,000,000............................750,000  HB3893- 5 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1    Total                                          $8,400,0002Payable from Local Tourism Fund: 3  For Choose Chicago................................3,967,2444  For grants to Convention and Tourism Bureaus5   Bureaus Outside of Chicago......................18,073,0006  For grants, contracts, and administrative 7   expenses associated with the 8   Local Tourism and Convention Bureau 9   Program pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/605-705 10   including prior years' costs.......................550,00011    Total                                         $22,590,244  12    Section 40. The sum of $12,666,866, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 14business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 15made for such purpose in Article 52, Section 40 of Public Act 16103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Tourism 17Promotion Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 18Opportunity For grants and awards pursuant to 20 ILCS 665, 19including prior year costs. 20    Section 45. The sum of $15,000,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 22business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 23made for such purpose in Article 52, Section 45 of Public Act 24103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Tourism   HB3893- 6 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1Promotion Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 2Opportunity For a tourism incentives grant program pursuant to 320 ILCS 665/8a. 4     The Department, with the consent in writing from the 5Governor, may reapportion not more than ten percent of the 6total appropriation of Tourism Promotion Fund, in Section 35, 7among the various purposes therein recommended. 8    Section 50. The following named amounts, or so much 9thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 10the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:11OFFICE OF EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING12GRANTS13Payable from the General Revenue Fund: 14  For the purpose of Grants, Contracts,15   and Administrative Expenses associated16   with DCEO Job Training17   and Workforce Programs, including18   prior years' costs..............................3,000,000 19Payable from the Federal Workforce Training Fund: 20  For Grants, Contracts and Administrative 21   Expenses Associated with the Workforce 22   Innovation and Opportunity Act and other 23   Workforce training programs, including refunds 24   and prior years' costs.........................325,000,000  HB3893- 7 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1Payable from the General Revenue Fund:2  For grants, contracts, and administrative expenses3   to support workforce services provided in coordination4   with Illinois Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act5   Title 1B Programs for Local Workforce Innovation Areas6   requiring supplemental support, as determined7   by the department, utilizing a needs-based assessment,8   including prior years' costs.....................5,000,0009  For a grant to the Illinois Manufacturing10   Excellence Center for expenses11   associated with a Made in Illinois12   Grant Program....................................1,000,000 13    Section 55. The following named amounts, or so much 14thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 15the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:16OFFICE OF ENTREPRENEURSHIP, INNOVATION AND TECHNOLOGY17GRANTS18Payable from the General Revenue Fund:19  For grants, contracts, and administrative20   expenses associated with the Illinois21   Office of Entrepreneurship, Innovation22   and Technology, including prior years' costs.....3,335,00023Payable from the General Revenue Fund:24  For Grants, Contracts and Administrative25   Expenses Associated with the Illinois  HB3893- 8 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1   SBIR/STTR Matching Funds Program2   Pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/605-1055.................7,500,0003  For Grants, Contracts and Administrative4   Expenses Associated with the5   Innovation Vouchers Program6   Pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/605-1060.................2,000,0007  For a grant to the Illinois Manufacturing Excellence Center8   for matching costs associated with the U.S. Department of9   Commerce's NIST Manufacturing Extension Partnership10   (MEP) program, and other federal awards for 11   Illinois manufacturing, including prior12   years' costs....................................2,000,000 13  For grants, contracts, and administrative14   expenses associated with DCEO 15   Technology Projects and Programs, including16   prior years' costs...............................7,500,00017    Total                                         $22,335,00018Payable from the Clean Air Act 19 Permit Fund: 20  For grants and administrative expenses of the 21   Small Business Environmental Assistance Program,22   including prior years' costs.......................525,00023Payable from the Workforce, Technology,  24 and Economic Development Fund: 25  For Grants, Contracts, and Administrative 26   Expenses Pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/   HB3893- 9 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1   605-420, including prior years' costs...........10,000,0002Payable from the Commerce and Community Affairs 3Assistance Fund: 4  For Grants, Contracts and Administrative 5   expenses of the APEX Accelerators Program, including 6   prior years' costs...............................1,500,0007  For Grants, Contracts, and Administrative 8   Expenses Pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/ 9   605-500, including prior years' costs...........15,000,00010  For Grants, Contracts, and Administrative 11   Expenses Pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/605-30,12   including prior years' costs ..................140,000,00013Payable from the State Small Business Credit  14 Initiative Fund:15  For the Purpose of Contracts, Grants,16   Loans, Investments and Administrative17   Expenses in Accordance with the State18   Small Business Credit Initiative Program,19   and other business development programs,20   including refunds and prior years' costs.......312,000,00021    Total                                       $479,025,000  22    Section 60. The sum of $34,466,386, or so much thereof as 23may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 24business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 25made for such purpose in Article 52, Section 60 of Public Act   HB3893- 10 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Workforce, 2Technology, and Economic Development Fund for Grants, 3Contracts, and Administrative Expenses Associated with 4Leveraging Federal Awards and Opportunities, including prior 5year costs. 6    Section 65. The following named amounts, or so much 7thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 8the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:9OFFICE OF BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT10OPERATIONS11Payable from South Suburban Brownfields12 Redevelopment Fund:13  For grants, contracts and administrative14   expenses of the South Suburban 15   Brownfields Redevelopment Program................4,000,00016Payable from Economic Research and  17 Information Fund: 18  For Purposes Set Forth in 19 Section 605-20 of the Civil 20   Administrative Code of Illinois 21   (20 ILCS 605/605-20)...............................150,000 22    Section 70. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much thereof as 23may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 24business on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation heretofore   HB3893- 11 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1made for such purposes in Article 52, Section 70 of Public Act 2103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Economic 3Research and Information Fund to the Department of Commerce 4and Economic Opportunity For grants, contracts, and 5administrative expenses associated with 20 ILCS 605/605-1007 6and the development, research, and implementation of IT 7solutions to improve access to information and streamline 8common processes for Illinois businesses including prior year 9costs. 10    Section 75. The sum of $34,000,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 12business on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation heretofore 13made for such purposes in Article 52, Section 75 of Public Act 14103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Workforce, 15Technology, and Economic Development Fund to the Department of 16Commerce and Economic Opportunity for all costs and expenses 17associated with the Employer Training Investment Program and 18other business retention and attraction activities, including 19prior year costs. 20    Section 80. The sum of $4,932,405, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 22business on June 30, 2025, from reappropriations heretofore 23made for such purposes in Article 52, Section 80 of Public Act 24103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Workforce,   HB3893- 12 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1Technology, and Economic Development Fund to the Department of 2Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants, contracts, and 3administrative expenses associated with Office of Minority 4Economic Empowerment small business support efforts, including 5prior year costs. 6    Section 85. The sum of $4,833,979, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 8business on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation heretofore 9made for such purposes in Article 52, Section 85 of Public Act 10103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Workforce, 11Technology, and Economic Development Fund to the Department of 12Commerce and Economic Opportunity for all costs and expenses 13associated with a marketing campaign to promote manufacturing, 14technology, and innovation in Illinois and increase the number 15of people entering high-demand manufacturing and technology 16occupations, including prior year costs. This may include 17costs and expenses associated with research to support 18marketing campaign efforts. The expenditures shall be at the 19approximate amounts below:20  For a marketing campaign to21   increase the number of people22   entering electric vehicle and23   electric vehicle component manufacturing24   occupations.....................................$2,000,000   HB3893- 13 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1    Section 90. The sum of $20,000,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 3business on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation heretofore 4made for such purposes in Article 52, Section 90 of Public Act 5103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Workforce, 6Technology, and Economic Development Fund to the Department of 7Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants and all ordinary 8and contingent expenses related to economic development and 9business attraction and retention purposes. 10    Section 100. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 12business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 13made for such purpose in Article 52, Section 100 of Public Act 14103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the General 15Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 16Opportunity for grants, contracts, and contingent costs 17Associated with Clean Energy and EV Career and Technical 18Education Pilot Program. 19    Section 105. The following named amounts, or so much 20thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 21the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:22OFFICE OF BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT GRANTS23Payable from the General Revenue Fund: 24  For a grant associated with Job training  HB3893- 14 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1   to the Chicago Federation of Labor,2   including prior years' costs.....................2,000,0003  For a grant associated with Job training4   to the Chicagoland Regional College Program,5   including prior years' costs.....................2,000,0006  For a grant to HACIA for costs7   associated with the development and8   execution of job training and other 9   operational expenses.............................3,200,00010  For a grant associated with job training11   to Richland Community College....................1,500,00012  For a grant associated with Job Training to the 13    Illinois Manufacturers' Association, including 14    prior years' costs............................. 1,466,30015  For a grant to the Chicagoland Chamber16   of Commerce for all costs associated17   with job training................................1,500,00018  For a grant to the Joliet Arsenal 19   Development Authority, including prior20   years' costs.......................................800,00021  For a grant associated with the Workforce22   Hub Program to HIRE360...........................2,233,20023  For a grant associated with job training to24   the Black Chambers of Commerce...................1,500,00025  For a grant to the Metro East Business26   Incubator Inc., including prior years' costs.......150,000  HB3893- 15 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  For grants and contingent costs2   associated with business development3   including prior years' costs.....................1,956,3004Payable from the General Revenue Fund:5  For deposit into the DCEO Projects Fund6   for Grants, Contracts, and Administrative 7   expenses, including technical and financial8   assistance for qualifying entities, 9   for costs associated with reducing food10   insecurity in urban and rural areas 11   throughout Illinois..............................5,000,00012Payable from the General Revenue Fund:13  For grants, contracts, and administrative costs14  associated with expanding accessibility15  of workforce development opportunities in16  rural communities throughout the state17  and for rural economic development, including18  prior years' costs................................2,000,00019Payable from the Illinois Capital Revolving Loan Fund:20  For the Purpose of Contracts, Grants,21   Loans, Investments and Administrative22   Expenses in Accordance with the Provisions23   Of the Small Business Development Act24   Pursuant to 30 ILCS 750/9, including25   prior years' costs...............................2,000,00026Payable from the Illinois Equity Fund:  HB3893- 16 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  For the purpose of Grants, Loans, and2   Investments in Accordance with the3   Provisions of the Small Business4   Development Act..................................1,900,0005Payable from the Large Business Attraction Fund:6  For the purpose of Grants, Loans,7   Investments, and Administrative 8   Expenses in Accordance with Article9   10 of the Build Illinois Act.......................500,00010  For grants, contracts, and administrative expenses in 11   Accordance with the Invest in Illinois12   Program Act, including prior years' costs......500,000,00013Payable from the Public Infrastructure Construction 14 Loan Revolving Fund:15  For the Purpose of Grants, Loans,16   Investments, and Administrative17   Expenses in Accordance with Article 818   of the Build Illinois Act........................1,000,000 19    Section 106. The amount of $7,900,000 or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, appropriated from the General Revenue 21Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 22for administrative costs and grants to the following named 23entities for all costs associated with economic development. 24The combined cost of grants and administrative expenses 25associated with each grant shall equal the approximate amounts   HB3893- 17 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1below:2Illinois Business and Economic Development Corporation3   dba- "Intersect Illinois" development...........$6,400,0004World Business Chicago.............................$1,500,000 5    Section 110. The named amounts, or so much thereof that 6remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2025, 7from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 8Article 52, Section 105 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 9hereby reappropriated from the DCEO Projects Fund to the 10Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity including 11prior years' costs:12For Grants, Contracts, and Administrative expenses, including 13technical & financial assistance for qualifying entities, for 14costs associated with reducing food insecurity in urban and 15rural areas throughout Illinois ...................29,923,000 16    Section 115. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 18the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:19ILLINOIS FILM OFFICE20Payable from the Tourism Promotion Fund: 21   For administrative expenses, grants, 22   and contracts associated with 23   advertising and promotion, including24   prior years' costs...............................2,016,300  HB3893- 18 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  Payable from the General Revenue Fund:2   For a grant to Whiteside County for all costs3   Associated with for the development of 4   the Northwest Illinois Film Office..................35,0005  Payable from the Illinois Production 6  Workforce Development Fund:7   For grants for workforce training 8   Programs pursuant to 35 ILCS 16/46...............1,000,000 9    Section 120. The following named amounts, or so much 10thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 11Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:12OFFICE OF TRADE AND INVESTMENT13OPERATIONS14Payable from the International Tourism Fund: 15  For Grants, Contracts, and Administrative 16   Expenses associated with the Illinois Office 17   of Trade and Investment, including 18   prior years' costs...............................1,575,00019Payable from the International and Promotional Fund: 20  For Grants, Contracts, Administrative 21   Expenses, and Refunds Pursuant to 22   20 ILCS 605/605-25, including 23   prior years' costs.................................300,00024Payable from the Tourism Promotion Fund: 25  For grants, contracts, and administrative   HB3893- 19 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1   expenses associated with the Illinois Office 2   of Trade and Investment, including 3   prior years' costs...............................4,441,900 4    Section 125. The following named amounts, or so much 5thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 6Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:7OFFICE OF COMMUNITY AND ENERGY ASSISTANCE8GRANTS9Payable from the Water and Sewer Low-Income10 Assistance Fund:11  For purposes of administrative costs, grants,12   and financial assistance pursuant13   to the Water and Sewer Financial Assistance14   Act Pursuant to 305 ILCS 21......................5,000,00015Payable from Supplemental Low-Income Energy  16 Assistance Fund: 17  For Grants and Administrative Expenses 18   Pursuant to Section 13 of the Energy 19   Assistance Act of 1989, as Amended, 20   including refunds and prior years' costs.......299,750,00021Payable from Energy Administration Fund: 22  For Grants, Contracts and Administrative 23   Expenses associated with DCEO Weatherization24   Programs, including refunds and prior25   years' costs...................................258,000,000  HB3893- 20 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1Payable from Low Income Home Energy  2 Assistance Block Grant Fund: 3  For Grants, Contracts and Administrative 4   Expenses associated with the Low-Income Home5   Energy Assistance Act of 1981, including 6   refunds and prior years' costs.................480,000,0007Payable from the Community Services Block Grant Fund: 8  For Administrative Expenses and Grants to9   Eligible Recipients as Defined in the10   Community Services Block Grant Act, including11   refunds and prior years' costs..................95,000,000 12    Section 130. The following named amounts, or so much 13thereof as may be necessary, respectively are appropriated to 14the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:15OFFICE OF COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT16Payable from the Community Development/Small17 Cities Block Grant Fund:18  For Grants to Local Units of Government 19   or Other Eligible Recipients and for contracts 20   and administrative expenses, as Defined in 21   the Community Development Act of 1974, or by 22   U.S. HUD Notice approving Supplemental allocation23   For the Illinois CDBG Program, including refunds 24   and prior years' costs.........................100,000,00025  For Administrative and Grant Expenses Relating  HB3893- 21 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1   to Training, Technical Assistance and 2   Administration of the Community Development 3   Assistance Programs, and for Grants to Local 4   Units of Government or Other Eligible5   Recipients as Defined in the Community 6   Development Act of 1974, as amended,7   for Illinois Cities with populations 8   under 50,000, including refunds 9   and prior years' costs.........................245,000,000 10    Section 135. The following named amounts, or so much 11thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 12the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:13Payable from the General Revenue Fund:14  For a grant to the Northeast DuPage Special15   Recreation Association.............................244,40016  For a grant to the AllenForce-Veterans17   Initiative for assistance to veterans..............100,00018  For a grant to William Rainey Harper College19   for costs associated with the Education and 20   Work Center in Hanover Park........................636,00021  For a grant to the Veterans Assistance22   Commission of Will County for23   Programmatic expenses..............................130,00024  For a grant to the National25   Main Street Center, Inc. for costs associated  HB3893- 22 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1   with the Illinois Main Street Program..............400,0002  Payable from the Agricultural Premium Fund:3   For a grant to the Rural Affairs4   Institute at Western Illinois University5   for Ordinary and Contingent Expenses...............160,000 6    Section 140. The following named amounts, or so much 7thereof as may be necessary, respectively are appropriated to 8the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:9OFFICE OF BROADBAND10Payable from the Commerce and Community11 Affairs Assistance Fund:12  For grants, contingent expenses,13   and expenditures for federal broadband14   awards provided by the Infrastructure15   Investment and Jobs Act of 2021,16   including prior years' costs...................625,000,00017Payable from the General Revenue Fund:18  For the ordinary and contingent expenses associated19   with the administration of the broadband program,20   including prior years' costs.....................1,249,50021Payable from the Digital Divide Elimination Fund:22  For grants, contingent expenses,23   and prior years' costs associated24   with the Broadband Deployment Program's25   Digital Literacy, Adoption and Equity Program......500,000  HB3893- 23 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1Payable from the Commerce and Community Affairs 2 Assistance Fund:3  For grants, contingent expenses,4   and expenditures for 5   Federal broadband awards........................33,000,000 6    Section 145. The sum of $5,111,400, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 8Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 9for ordinary and contingent expenses associated with the 10Illinois Works Jobs Program Act 30 ILCS 559/20, including 11prior years' costs. 12    Section 150. The sum of $400,000, or so much thereof as may 13be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 14the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for the 15purposes of operating assistance to the City of East St. 16Louis. 17    Section 155. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much therefore 18as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 19Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 20for grants to certified convention bureaus for the development 21of tourism, education, preservation, and promotion of the 22100th anniversary of Route 66.   HB3893- 24 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1    Section 160. The sum of $350,000,000, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Energy 3Transition Assistance Fund to the Department of Commerce and 4Economic Opportunity for operational expenses, grants, 5contracts and expenditures pursuant to the Energy Transition 6Act, including prior years' costs. 7    Section 165. The sum of $28,005,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the Coal to Solar and 9Energy Storage Initiative Fund to the Department of Commerce 10and Economic Opportunity for operational expenses, grants, 11contracts and expenditures pursuant to the Energy Transition 12Act. 13    Section 170. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 15Commerce and Economic Opportunity from the Loan Loss Reserve 16Fund for all costs associated with the DCEO Loan Guarantee 17Program, including prior years' costs. 18    Section 180. The sum of $50,000,000, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the Workforce, 20Technology, and Economic Development Fund to the Department of 21Commerce and Economic Opportunity for Grants, Contracts, and 22Administrative Expenses Associated with Customized Training, 23Recruitment, and Business Development Efforts.   HB3893- 25 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1    Section 185. The sum of $7,500,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 3Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 4for Grants to Illinois Retail Merchants Association for all 5costs associated with the promotion, workforce development, 6and training. 7    Section 190. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof as may 8be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 9on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore made for 10such purpose in Article 52, Section 190 of Public Act 11103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Used Tire 12Management Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 13Opportunity for a grant to Natural Fiber Welding for expenses 14associated with research and development. 15    Section 195. The amount of $469,570 or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 17business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 18made for such purposes in Article 52, Section 195 of Public Act 19103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the General 20Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 21Opportunity for administrative costs and grants to the 22following named entities for all costs associated with tourism 23promotion. The combined cost of grants and administrative   HB3893- 26 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1expenses associated with each grant shall equal the 2approximate amounts below:3Choose Chicago.....................................$2,500,0004Chicago North Shore..................................$625,0005Chicago Southland....................................$625,0006Meet Chicago Northwest...............................$625,0007DuPage Convention & Visitors Bureau..................$625,0008All other certified convention9and visitors bureaus...............................$2,500,000 10    Section 205. The amount of $1,727,572, or so much thereof 11that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 122025, from a reappropriated heretofore made for such purpose 13in Article 52, Section 205 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 14is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 15the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 16grant to the Illinois Retail Merchants Association for all 17costs associated with promotion, workforce development, and 18training, including prior years' costs. 19    Section 210. The amount of $2,500,000, or so much thereof 20that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 212025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 22in Article 52, Section 210 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 23is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 24the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a   HB3893- 27 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1grant to the Illinois Hotel and Lodging Association for all 2costs associated with workforce development and training, 3including prior years' costs. 4    Section 215. The amount of $3,500,000, or so much thereof 5that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 62025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 7in Article 52, Section 215 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 8is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 9the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 10grant to the Joliet Area Historical Museum for expenses 11associated with the restoration of the property formerly 12operated as the Joliet Correctional Center, including prior 13years' costs. 14    Section 225. The amount of $100,000, or so much thereof 15that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 162025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 17in Article 52, Section 225 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 18is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 19the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 20grant to the Safer Foundation for all costs associated with 21the women bridge construction training program, including 22prior years' costs. 23    Section 230. The amount of $200,000, or so much thereof   HB3893- 28 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 22025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 3in Article 52, Section 230 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 4is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 5the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 6grant to Black Oaks Center for all costs associated with 7operating expenses, including prior years' costs. 8    Section 235. The amount of $100,000, or so much thereof 9that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 102025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 11in Article 52, Section 235 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 12is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 13the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 14grant to the City of Rock Island for all costs and operating 15expenses of the Quad Cities Regional Film Office, including 16prior years' costs. 17    Section 240. The amount of $24,952,778, or so much thereof 18that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 192025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 20in Article 52, Section 240 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 21is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 22the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants 23and administrative expenses associated with public safety and 24economic development to the following named entities, in the   HB3893- 29 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1approximate amounts below, including prior years' costs:2  Village of Crest Hill..............................$250,0003  Village of Plainfield..............................$250,0004  Village of Bolingbrook.............................$250,0005  Wheatland Township.................................$250,0006  Oswego Rt 30 and Wolf's Crossing...................$250,0007  City of Champaign..................................$750,0008  Niles Township Social Worker Respite Program.......$250,0009    Rolling Meadows Neighborhood Resource10  Center & Social Services Program...................$500,00011  Village of Milan...................................$250,00012  Village of Roseville...............................$250,00013  Village of Hazel Crest ............................$650,00014  Village of Matteson................................$750,00015  Orland Township Highway Department.................$250,00016  Village of Orland Hills..........................$1,250,00017  Village of Frankfort...............................$600,00018  City of St. Charles................................$250,00019  City of Geneva.....................................$250,00020  City of Batavia....................................$250,00021  Village of North Aurora............................$250,00022  Village of Oswego..................................$250,00023  Village of Montgomery..............................$250,00024  City of Aurora.....................................$250,00025  City of Naperville.................................$250,00026  South Chicago Heights..............................$250,000  HB3893- 30 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  Park Forest School Dist 163........................$250,0002  Rich Township......................................$250,0003  Village of Wilmington..............................$250,0004  City of Peoria.....................................$250,0005  City of Bloomington................................$250,0006  Town of Normal.....................................$250,0007  County of Peoria...................................$125,0008  Village of Bartonville.............................$125,0009  Village of West Peoria.............................$125,00010  Village of Peoria Heights..........................$125,00011  City of East Peoria................................$125,00012  City of Washington.................................$125,00013  Center for Tax and Budget Accountability...........$250,00014  Northbrook Park District...........................$250,00015  City of Park Ridge.................................$250,00016  Argo Community High School District 217..........$1,000,00017  Berwyn Township Public Health District.............$250,00018  City of Rockford...................................$500,00019  Village of Cherry Valley...........................$250,00020  City of Belvidere..................................$250,00021  Shorewood Police Department........................$250,00022  Village of Romeoville..............................$200,00023  Joliet Police Department...........................$200,00024  City of Urbana...................................$1,000,00025  City of Elmhurst...................................$850,00026  Village of Hinsdale................................$850,000  HB3893- 31 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  Village of Mundelein...............................$250,0002  One Hope United Waukegan...........................$650,0003  City of North Chicago..............................$200,0004  City of Waukegan...................................$200,0005  Northeastern Illinois Regional Crime Lab.........$1,000,0006  Deerfield Police Department........................$250,0007  Lake Forest Police Department......................$250,0008  Park Ridge Police Department.......................$250,0009  Des Plaines Police Department......................$250,00010  Schaumburg Police Department.......................$250,00011  Village of Schaumburg..............................$300,00012  Village of Bridgeview..............................$500,00013  Village of North Riverside.........................$250,00014  Kates Detective and Security Academy Inc...........$450,00015  Village of Chatham.................................$400,00016  Ada S McKinley Community Services..................$562,50017  Little Village Chamber of Commerce.................$250,00018  Economic Strategies Development Corporation........$250,00019  Westside NAACP.....................................$250,00020  Life Shack.........................................$250,00021  Meet Chicago Northwest...........................$1,250,00022  Summer Music Series................................$250,00023  Englewood Chamber of Commerce....................$1,000,00024  Downtown Springfield, Inc..........................$500,00025  Moving Pillsbury Forward.........................$1,200,00026  Route History......................................$550,000  HB3893- 32 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1    Mount Greenwood Community and2   Business Association..............................$250,0003  Chicago 95th Street Business Association...........$250,0004  Beverly Arts Center................................$250,0005  Morgan Park Beverly Hills Business Association.....$250,0006  Positive Moves.....................................$250,0007  Black Contractors Owners and Executives............$500,0008  Whiz Kids Foundation.............................$1,000,0009  House of James.....................................$250,00010  New Mount Tabor Missionary Baptist Church..........$250,00011  Restoration Ministries.............................$250,00012  Link Further.......................................$250,00013  City of Madison....................................$250,00014  New Covenant Community Development Corporation.....$500,00015  Center for Tax and Budget Accountability...........$250,00016  Westside NAACP.....................................$250,00017  Manhattan Fire District............................$250,00018    Total                                         $35,022,575 19    Section 245. The amount of $250,000, or so much thereof 20that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 212025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 22in Article 52, Section 245 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 23is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 24the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 25grant to the South Asian American Chamber of Commerce for   HB3893- 33 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1costs associated with operating expenses, including prior 2years' costs. 3    Section 255. The amount of $250,000, or so much thereof 4that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 52025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 6in Article 52, Section 255 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 7is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 8the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 9grant to the Assyrian American Chamber of Commerce for costs 10associated with operating expenses, including prior years' 11costs. 12    Section 260. The amount of $250,000, or so much thereof 13that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 142025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 15in Article 52, Section 260 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 16is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 17the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 18grant to the SAAPRI for costs associated with operating 19expenses, including prior years' costs. 20    Section 265. The amount of $250,000, or so much thereof 21that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 222025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 23in Article 52, Section 265 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended,   HB3893- 34 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 2the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 3grant to the Village of Lincolnwood for costs associated with 4operating expenses, including prior years' costs. 5    Section 270. The amount of $250,000, or so much thereof 6that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 72025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 8in Article 52, Section 270 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 9is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 10the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 11grant to the City of Des Plaines for costs associated with the 12restaurant incentives program, including prior years' costs. 13    Section 275. The amount of $65,000, or so much thereof 14that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 152025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 16in Article 52, Section 275 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 17is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 18the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 19grant to Metropolitan Family Services for capital improvements 20and or equipment, including prior years' costs. 21    Section 280. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 22that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 232025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose   HB3893- 35 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1in Article 52, Section 280 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 2is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 3the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 4grant to the Greater Englewood Chamber of Commerce for 5operating expenses, including prior years' costs. 6    Section 290. The amount of $500,000, or so much thereof 7that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 82025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 9in Article 52, Section 290 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 10is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 11the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 12grant to the Village of Morton Grove for the purchase of a fire 13truck, including prior years' costs. 14    Section 300. The amount of $500,000, or so much thereof 15that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 162025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 17in Article 52, Section 300 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 18is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 19the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 20grant to Rockford Area Convention Bureau for talent 21acquisition, including prior years' costs. 22    Section 305. The amount of $452,360, or so much thereof 23that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30,   HB3893- 36 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b12025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 2in Article 52, Section 305 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 3is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 4the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity to provide 5unemployment insurance relief in response to the COVID-19 6pandemic to eligible small restaurants in the City of 7Rockford, including prior years' costs. 8    Section 310. The amount of $3,128, or so much thereof that 9remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2025, 10from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 11Article 52, Section 310 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 12hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 13the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 14grant to Ice and Fire Mentor Program for the purpose of youth 15operations, including prior years' costs. 16    Section 315. The amount of $25,000, or so much thereof 17that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 182025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 19in Article 52, Section 315 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 20is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 21the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 22grant to American Legion Illinois Premier Boys State for the 23purpose of operational expenses, including prior years' costs.   HB3893- 37 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1    Section 320. The amount of $25,000, or so much thereof 2that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 32025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 4in Article 52, Section 320 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 5is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 6the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 7grant to American Legion Post 52 Romeoville for the purpose of 8operational expenses, including prior years' costs. 9    Section 325. The amount of $122,908, or so much thereof 10that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 112025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 12in Article 52, Section 325 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 13is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 14the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 15grant to the South Side Help Center for operating expenses 16including prior years' costs. 17    Section 330. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 18that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 192025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 20in Article 52, Section 330 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 21is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 22the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 23grant to the Chicago Southland Economic Development 24Corporation for operating expenses, including prior years'   HB3893- 38 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1costs. 2    Section 335. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 3that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 42025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 5in Article 52, Section 335 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 6is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 7the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 8grant to the Village of Dolton for operating expenses, 9including prior years' costs. 10    Section 340. The amount of $125,000, or so much thereof 11that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 122025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 13in Article 52, Section 340 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 14is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 15the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 16grant to the Mosque Foundation for operating expenses, 17including prior years' costs. 18    Section 345. The amount of $500,000, or so much thereof 19that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 202025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 21in Article 52, Section 345 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 22is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 23the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a   HB3893- 39 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1grant to Village of Burbank for operating expenses. 2    Section 350. The amount of $500,000, or so much thereof 3that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 42025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 5in Article 52, Section 350 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 6is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 7the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 8grant to the MTC Community Outreach Cooperation for costs 9associated with Phases I and II of the Community Center 10Project, including prior years' costs. 11    Section 355. The amount of $2,811,975, or so much thereof 12that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 132025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 14in Article 52, Section 355 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 15is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 16the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 17grant to OSF St. Elizabeth Medical Center to facilitate the 18transition to a new electronic medical health record system 19and other necessary technology improvements for properties 20purchased under a multiple location hospital license, 21including prior years' costs. 22    Section 360. The amount of $485,000, or so much thereof 23that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30,   HB3893- 40 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b12025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 2in Article 52, Section 360 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 3is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 4the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 5grant to Rich Township for operational and infrastructure 6costs, including prior years' costs. 7    Section 365. The amount of $1,500,000, or so much thereof 8that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 92025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 10in Article 52, Section 365 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 11is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 12the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 13grant to the City of Elgin for operational and infrastructure 14costs, including prior years' costs. 15    Section 375. The amount of $3,800,000, or so much thereof 16that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 172025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 18in Article 52, Section 375 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 19is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 20the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 21grant to Rich Township for costs associated with capital 22improvements and operational costs, including prior years' 23costs.   HB3893- 41 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1    Section 380. The amount of $1,638,765, or so much thereof 2that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 32025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 4in Article 52, Section 380 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 5is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 6the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 7grant to St. Clair County for costs associated with the St. 8Clair County Demolition Program, including prior years' costs. 9    Section 385. The amount of $2,500,000, or so much thereof 10that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 112025, from a reappropriation made for such purpose in Article 1252, Section 385 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is hereby 13reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to the 14Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants to 15non-profits, units of local governments, and school districts 16for operating expenses, including prior years' costs. 17    Section 395. The amount of $750,000, or so much thereof 18that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 192025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 20in Article 52, Section 395 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 21is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 22the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 23grant to the Grand O'Hare Chamber of Commerce for operating 24expenses, including prior years' costs.   HB3893- 42 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1    Section 400. The amount of $350,000, or so much thereof 2that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 32025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 4in Article 52, Section 400 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 5is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 6the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 7grant to the Oak Park Arts Council for operating expenses, 8including prior years' costs. 9    Section 410. The amount of $8,904,916, or so much thereof 10that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 112025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 12in Article 52, Section 410 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 13is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 14the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 15grant to the Tinley Park District costs associated with the 16remediation and cleanup of the Tinley Park Mental Health 17Center, including prior years' costs. 18    Section 415. The named amounts, or so much thereof that 19remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2025, 20from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 21Article 52, Section 415 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 22hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 23the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity including   HB3893- 43 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1prior years' costs:2OFFICE OF BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT GRANTS3  For a grant to the South Asian Chamber4   of Commerce of Illinois.............................18,0565  For a grant to Pan Asian American Center............109,6666  For a grant to the Indo-American Center.............125,0007  For a grant to South Central Community Services......64,4128  For a grant to Chatham Business Association.........250,0009  For a grant to Southeast Chicago Chamber of Commerce.123,01510  For a grant to Greater Roseland Chamber of Commerce.250,00011  For a grant to Our Lady of Good Council-Teen12   Reach/Teen Reach at Blessed Sacrament..............100,00013  For a grant to Back of the Yards14   Neighborhood Council...................................36315  For a grant to Mount Greenwood Community16   and Business Association...........................250,00017  For a grant to Little Village Chamber of Commerce18   Little Village Community Foundation.................82,50119  For a grant to Village of Cahokia...................125,00020  For a grant to Midwest Career Source21   Vocational School........................................722  For a grant to Illinois Central College.............166,78023  For a grant to AAABNA Austin African American24   Business Networking Association.....................42,74925  For a grant to Greater Auburn Gresham................40,70826  For a grant to U-Two Mentorship Program, Inc............973  HB3893- 44 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  For a grant to Black Chamber of Commerce2   of Lake County......................................33,3863  For a grant to South Holland Business Association...125,0004  For a grant to Chamber 57 (Matteson, Richton5   Park, Homewood, Flossmoor Areas)...................125,0006  For a grant to Village of Bridgeview................250,0007  For a grant to City of Park City......................1,801 8    Section 420. The sum of $200,000, or so much thereof that 9remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2025, 10from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 11Article 52, Section 420 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 12hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 13the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 14grant to the Village of Washington Park for costs associated 15with equipment for the police and fire departments, including 16prior years' costs. 17    Section 425. The amount of $210,868, or so much thereof 18that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 192025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 20in Article 52, Section 425 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 21is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 22the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 23grant to the Asian American Chamber of Commerce of Illinois, 24including prior years' costs.   HB3893- 45 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1    Section 440. The amount of $1,627, or so much thereof that 2remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2025, 3from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 4Article 52, Section 440 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 5hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 6the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 7grant to the Black Business Alliance Peoria Chapter for 8operating expenses, including prior years' costs. 9    Section 450. The amount of $100,000, or so much thereof 10that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 112025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 12in Article 52, Section 450 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 13is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 14the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 15grant to the Sunshine Cultural Arts Center for costs 16associated with operational expenses, including prior years' 17costs. 18    Section 455. The amount of $300,000, or so much thereof 19that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 202025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 21in Article 52, Section 455 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 22is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 23the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a   HB3893- 46 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1grant to the Pearls of Power for costs associated with 2operational expenses including prior years' costs. 3    Section 465. The amount of $97,723, or so much thereof 4that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 52025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 6in Article 52, Section 465 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 7is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 8the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 9grant to The Well Experience for the purpose of providing 10support for children from birth to 18 years of age, including 11prior years' costs. 12    Section 470. The amount of $228,150, or so much thereof 13that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 142025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 15in Article 52, Section 470 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 16is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 17the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 18grant to DREAAM Opportunity Center for the purpose of 19supporting the development, implementation, operational costs, 20and evaluation of a state-of-the-art early childhood center 21with a focus on Black cultural education, wraparound services 22and early intervention, family mental health services, and 23culturally relevant parental engagement, including prior 24years' costs.   HB3893- 47 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1    Section 475. The amount of $15,465,545, or so much thereof 2that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 32025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 4in Article 52, Section 475 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 5is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 6the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants 7to the following units of local government for community 8development, violence prevention and administrative costs, 9including prior years' costs:10  City of Rockford.................................$1,500,00011  City of Loves Park.................................$500,00012  City of Belvidere................................$1,000,00013  City of East Moline..............................$1,500,00014  City of Moline...................................$1,500,00015  City of Champaign................................$2,000,00016  City of Urbana...................................$2,000,00017  City of Danville.................................$1,000,00018  City of Peoria...................................$3,000,00019  City of East Peoria................................$500,00020  Village of Peoria Heights..........................$250,00021  City of West Peoria................................$250,00022  Village of Bartonville.............................$250,00023  City of Bloomington................................$500,00024  Town of Normal.....................................$500,00025  City of Springfield..............................$3,000,000  HB3893- 48 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  City of Decatur..................................$1,000,0002  City of Alton....................................$1,000,0003  City of Granite City.............................$1,000,0004  City of East St. Louis...........................$3,000,0005  City of Cahokia Heights..........................$3,000,0006  Venice Township....................................$250,0007  Village of Washington Park.........................$250,0008  Village of Brooklyn................................$250,0009  Village of Fairmont................................$250,00010  City of Cairo......................................$500,00011  City of Carbondale.................................$500,000 12    Section 480. The amount of $1,825, or so much thereof that 13remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2025, 14from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 15Article 52, Section 480 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 16hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 17the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 18grant to the Harford Confluence Tower, including prior years' 19costs. 20    Section 485. The amount of $11,974, or so much thereof 21that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 222025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 23in Article 52, Section 485 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 24is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to   HB3893- 49 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 2grant to the CARITAS Family Solutions Development, including 3prior years' costs. 4    Section 490. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much thereof 5that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 62025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 7in Article 52, Section 490 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 8is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 9the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 10grant to Village of Bridgeview for costs associated with Seat 11Geek Stadium upgrades and tourism, including prior years' 12costs. 13    Section 495. The amount of $300,000, or so much thereof 14that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 152025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 16in Article 52, Section 495 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 17is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 18the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 19grant to North Riverside for costs associated with the capital 20improvements to West Central Consolidated Communication 21Dispatch Center serving the Villages of Riverside, North 22Riverside, Brookfield and McCook, including prior years' 23costs.   HB3893- 50 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1    Section 500. The amount of $250,000, or so much thereof 2that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 32025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 4in Article 52, Section 500 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 5is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 6the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 7grant to City of Burbank for costs associated with 8infrastructure, including prior years' costs. 9    Section 505. The amount of $250,000, or so much thereof 10that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 112025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 12in Article 52, Section 505 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 13is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 14the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 15grant to City of Berwyn for costs associated with 16infrastructure, including prior years' costs. 17    Section 510. The amount of $150,000, or so much thereof 18that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 192025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 20in Article 52, Section 510 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 21is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 22the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 23grant to the Village of Bedford Park for costs associated with 24infrastructure, including prior years' costs.   HB3893- 51 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1    Section 515. The amount of $980,000, or so much thereof 2that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 32025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 4in Article 52, Section 515 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 5is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 6the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 7grant to the City of Plainfield for costs associated with 8water infrastructure improvements, including prior years' 9costs. 10    Section 525. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much thereof 11that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 122025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 13in Article 52, Section 525 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 14is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 15the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 16grant to the City of Niles for costs associated with a Salt 17Dome, including prior years' costs. 18    Section 530. The amount of $1,250,000, or so much thereof 19that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 202025, from reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 21Article 52, Section 530 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 22hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 23the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a   HB3893- 52 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1grant to the City of Lake Bluff for costs associated with a 2pedestrian bridge, including prior years' costs. 3    Section 550. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 4that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 52025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 6in Article 52, Section 550 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 7is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 8the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 9grant to Kankakee County for costs associated with 10infrastructure improvements in the following units of local 11government, including prior years' costs:12Kankakee Valley Park District....................... $150,00013Bourbonnais...........................................$50,00014Chebanse Township.....................................$50,00015Bradley..............................................$100,00016Essex.................................................$50,00017Pilot Township........................................$50,00018Reddick...............................................$50,00019South Wilmington......................................$50,00020Braceville............................................$50,00021Herscher.............................................$100,00022Union Hill...........................................$100,00023City of Kankakee.....................................$200,000 24    Section 565. The amount of $20,600, or so much thereof   HB3893- 53 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 22025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 3in Article 52, Section 565 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 4is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 5the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 6grant to Elmhurst Park District for costs associated with 7infrastructure improvements to the Senior Center Kitchen, 8including prior years' costs. 9    Section 575. The amount of $55,000, or so much thereof 10that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 112025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 12in Article 52, Section 575 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 13is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 14the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 15grant to Hinsdale Community Services for costs associated with 16infrastructure improvements, including prior years' costs. 17    Section 580. The amount of $168,744, or so much thereof 18that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 192025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 20in Article 52, Section 580 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 21is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 22the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 23grant to the City of Urbana for costs associated with the 24Illinois Law Enforcement Alarm System, including prior years'   HB3893- 54 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1costs. 2    Section 595. The amount of $150,000, or so much thereof 3that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 42025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 5in Article 52, Section 595 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 6is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 7the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 8grant to the Cicero Fire Department for costs associated with 9operating expenses, including prior years' costs. 10    Section 600. The amount of $150,000, or so much thereof 11that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 122025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 13in Article 52, Section 600 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 14is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 15the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 16grant to the City of Berwyn for costs associated with 17operating expenses of its fire department, including costs 18associated with facility expansion, including prior years' 19costs. 20    Section 605. The amount of $16,200, or so much thereof 21that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 222025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 23in Article 52, Section 605 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended,   HB3893- 55 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 2the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 3grant to the Stickney Fire Department for costs associated 4with operating expenses, including prior years' costs. 5    Section 610. The amount of $150,000, or so much thereof 6that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 72025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 8in Article 52, Section 610 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 9is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 10the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 11grant to the Lyons Fire Department for costs associated with 12operating expenses, including prior years' costs. 13    Section 620. The amount of $100,000, or so much thereof 14that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 152025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 16in Article 52, Section 620 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 17is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 18the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 19grant to the Brookfield Fire Department for costs associated 20with operating expenses, including prior years' costs. 21    Section 630. The amount of $100,000, or so much thereof 22that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 232025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose   HB3893- 56 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1in Article 52, Section 630 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 2is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 3the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 4grant to Regional 911 for costs associated with operating 5expenses, including prior years' costs. 6    Section 635. The amount of $593,000, or so much thereof 7that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 82025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 9in Article 52, Section 635 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 10is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 11the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 12grant to the Village of Orland Hills for costs associated with 13infrastructure improvements, including prior years' costs. 14    Section 640. The amount of $456,889, or so much thereof 15that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 162025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 17in Article 52, Section 640 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 18is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 19the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 20grant to the Orland Fire Protection District for costs 21associated with infrastructure improvements, including prior 22years' costs. 23    Section 645. The amount of $100,000, or so much thereof   HB3893- 57 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 22025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 3in Article 52, Section 645 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 4is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 5the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 6grant to the Orland Township Road District dba Orland Township 7Highway Department for costs associated with infrastructure 8improvements, including prior years' costs. 9    Section 650. The amount of $225,000, or so much thereof 10that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 112025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 12in Article 52, Section 650 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 13is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 14the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 15grant to the Village of Hazel Crest for costs associated with 16infrastructure improvements, including prior years' costs. 17    Section 670. The amount of $651,555, or so much thereof 18that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 192025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 20in Article 52, Section 670 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 21is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 22the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 23grant to Williamson County Airport Authority dba Veterans 24Airport of Southern Illinois costs associated with daily   HB3893- 58 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1flights from Marion to Chicago, including prior years' costs. 2    Section 675. The amount of $1,482, or so much thereof that 3remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2025, 4from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 5Article 52, Section 675 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 6hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 7the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants 8to the Barat Education Foundation for the costs associated 9with operating funds, including prior years' costs. 10    Section 680. The amount of $300,000, or so much thereof 11that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 122025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 13in Article 52, Section 680 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 14is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 15the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 16grant to the Illinois Retail Merchants Association for 17creating and operating an organized retail crime association 18to combat organized retail crime, including prior years' 19costs. 20    Section 685. The sum of $200,000, or so much thereof that 21remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2025, 22from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 23Article 52, Section 685 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is   HB3893- 59 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 2the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 3grant to the Village of Washington Park for costs associated 4with equipment for the police and fire departments, including 5the purchase of property and/or infrastructure improvements 6necessary for constructing a new fire station/public safety 7building, including prior years' costs. 8    Section 690. The amount of $150,000, or so much thereof 9that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 102025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 11in Article 52, Section 690 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 12is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 13the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 14grant to the Austin Fresh Market for operating expenses, 15including prior years' costs. 16    Section 695. The amount of $185,207, or so much thereof 17that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 182025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 19in Article 52, Section 695 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 20is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 21the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 22grant to the North Austin Council for operating expenses, 23including prior years' costs.   HB3893- 60 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1    Section 705. The amount of $50,000, or so much thereof 2that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 32025, from reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 4Article 52, Section 705 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 5hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 6the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 7grant to Good Samaritan House for operating expenses, 8including prior years' costs. 9    Section 710. The amount of $23,210,203, or so much thereof 10that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 112025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 12in Article 52, Section 710 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 13is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 14the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants 15to the following named entities including non-profits and 16units of local government for violence interruption, community 17development and operational expenses and administrative costs 18including prior years' costs.19Each grant shall equal the approximate amounts below:20  United Way of St Louis.............................$500,00021  Greater Auburn Gresham CDC.........................$450,00022  Urban Growers Collective ..........................$150,00023  Demoiselle 2 Femme, NFP............................$150,00024  Target Area Development............................$150,00025  Kindness Campaign..................................$150,000  HB3893- 61 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  RAGE (Resident Association of Greater Englewood....$350,0002  Englewood First Responders.........................$150,0003  A Knock At Midnight................................$250,0004  Teamwork Englewood.................................$350,0005  Public Equity......................................$150,0006  GoodKidsMadCity-Englewood..........................$250,0007  TGI Movement.......................................$150,0008  Ex-Cons for Community Social Change................$250,0009  Stay Lit Youth Services............................$150,00010  Teatro Tariakuri Dance and Theatre.................$150,00011  Community Youth Development Institute (CYDI).......$250,00012  Inner-City Muslim Action Network (IMAN)............$150,00013  Woodlawn Restorative Justice Hub...................$150,00014  Precious Blood Ministry of Reconciliation..........$150,00015  Southside Together Organizing for Power (STOP).....$250,00016  LaTanya & The Youth of Englewood...................$150,00017  Grow Greater Englewood.............................$150,00018  Teamwork Englewood.................................$150,00019  Greater Englewood CDC..............................$150,00020  Le Penseur Youth & Family Services.................$150,00021  Purpose Over Pain..................................$150,00022  Bounce for Joy Project.............................$150,00023  Project Simeon 2000................................$150,00024  Gresham Community Center...........................$150,00025  House of James...................................$1,000,00026  Outreach Christian Community Development Corp....$1,000,000  HB3893- 62 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  Christian Community Health Center................$1,000,0002  Positive Moves NFP...............................$1,000,0003  After The Game Inc...............................$1,000,0004  Ada S. McKinley..................................$5,000,0005  The African American Museum at the England Manor...$200,0006  Black Chamber of Commerce of Lake County...........$200,0007  Lake County Chamber of Commerce....................$200,0008  Cory Douglas Scholastic Academy....................$250,0009  Lions Math & Science Christian Academy.............$250,00010  Westside Community Center, Inc.....................$200,00011  Step by Step Daycare...............................$400,00012  Christopher D. Redding Youth Asthma Foundation.....$400,00013  GiveNKind..........................................$500,00014  Waukegan Park District.............................$350,00015  Foss Park District.................................$350,00016  Mundelein Park District............................$350,00017  Vista Medical Center East in Waukegan..............$650,00018  Brushwood Center at Ryerson Woods..................$700,00019  Hyde Park Neighborhood Club........................$250,00020  South Shore Chamber................................$250,00021  Centro de Trabajadores.............................$250,00022  Quad Communities Development Corp..................$250,00023  DuSable Museum.....................................$700,00024  Rogers Park Business Alliance......................$500,00025  Andersonville Chamber of Commerce..................$500,00026  Uptown United......................................$500,000  HB3893- 63 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  Lincoln Square Ravenswood Chamber of Commerce......$500,0002  Edgewater Chamber of Commerce......................$500,0003  A Just Harvest.....................................$500,0004  Heartland Health Centers...........................$500,0005  Family Matters.....................................$125,0006  Chinese Mutual Aid Association.....................$125,0007  Black Ensemble Theater.............................$125,0008  Youth Guidance.....................................$125,0009  Ethiopian Community Association....................$250,00010  Friends of McCutcheon Elementary School............$250,00011  Refugee One........................................$250,00012  Ethiopian Community Association....................$250,00013  African American History Museum....................$275,00014  Decatur Boys & Girls Club..........................$350,00015  Compass for Kids.................................$150,00016  Decatur Pastors Coalition..........................$100,00017  Sangamon County.....................................$25,00018  Springfield Urban League...........................$500,00019  Springfield ICON...................................$150,00020  Metro Black Chamber of Commerce....................$200,00021  Springfield Project................................$200,00022  Fifth Street Renaissance.........................$1,500,00023  Downtown Springfield Inc...........................$300,00024  The LYNC...........................................$100,00025  Greater All Nations Tabernacle.....................$550,00026  Pure Haven Family Resource Center..................$200,000  HB3893- 64 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  Mount Pilgrim Development Corp.....................$500,0002  People's Community Development Association.........$500,0003  Greater Rock Development Corp......................$500,0004  Acclivus Inc.......................................$250,0005  Westside Health Authority..........................$500,0006  Boxing Out Negativity..............................$350,0007  Cottage Grove Heights Community Coalition...........$50,0008  Global Girls Inc....................................$50,0009  Majestic Florist....................................$50,00010  True to Life Foundation............................$100,00011  Rosemoor Community Association.....................$100,00012  West Chesterfield Community Association............$100,00013  Dolton School District #149........................$150,00014  Greater Roseland Chamber of Commerce...............$250,00015  Thornton Township..................................$500,00016  Chatham Business Association.......................$750,00017  Southeast Chicago Chamber of Commerce..............$750,00018  South Central Community Service....................$750,00019  Xi Lambda Education Foundation.....................$150,00020  Mu Delta Lambda Charitable Foundation..............$250,00021  IDEAL Educational Foundation.......................$100,00022  AKArama Foundation Inc.............................$100,00023  Yellow Tea Rose Foundation.........................$100,00024  D'ESTEE Inc........................................$100,00025  Monarch Awards Foundation Inc......................$100,00026  Alpha Kappa Alpha - Phi Epsilon Omega Chapter......$100,000  HB3893- 65 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  Treatment Alternatives for Safe Communities......$2,000,0002  Champs Male Mentoring Program - Chirise............$100,0003  South Technical Center..............................$50,000 4    Section 715. The amount of $5,975,000, or so much thereof 5that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 62025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 7in Article 52, Section 715 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 8is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 9the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants 10to non-profits and units of local government for violence 11interruption, community development, and operational expenses, 12including prior years' costs. 13    Section 720. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 14that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 152025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 16in Article 52, Section 720 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 17is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 18the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 19grant to Reclaiming Chicago for costs associated with 20purchasing and installing solar panels in Lawndale, including 21prior years' costs. 22    Section 730. The amount of $360,000, or so much thereof 23that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30,   HB3893- 66 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b12025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 2in Article 52, Section 730 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 3is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 4the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 5grant to St. Joseph Academy for all costs associated with 6repairs, maintenance, and other capital improvements, as well 7as operations and services, including prior years' costs. 8    Section 740. The amount of $314,464, or so much thereof 9that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 102025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 11in Article 52, Section 740 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 12is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 13the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 14grant to Peoria Civic Center for audience building seed 15investment, including prior years' costs. 16    Section 745. The amount of $5,850, or so much thereof that 17remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2025, 18from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in by 19Article 52, Section 745 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 20hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 21the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 22grant to Big Picture Peoria for a mural project, including 23prior years' costs.   HB3893- 67 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1    Section 750. The sum of $5,477, or so much thereof that 2remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2025, 3from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 4Article 52, Section 750 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 5hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 6the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 7grant to the City of Rock Island for all costs and operating 8expenses of the Quad Cities Regional Film Office, including 9prior years' costs. 10    Section 760. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 11that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 122025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 13in Article 52, Section 760 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 14is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 15the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 16grant to the Village of Bridgeview for costs associated with 17promotional expenses, including prior years' costs. 18    Section 765. The amount of $429,306, or so much thereof 19that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 202025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 21in Article 52, Section 765 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 22is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 23the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 24grant to the Hispanic Chamber of Commerce of Illinois,   HB3893- 68 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1including prior years' costs. 2    Section 770. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much thereof 3that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 42025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 5in Article 52, Section 770 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 6is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 7the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 8grant to Enjoy Illinois Tourism for NASCAR for the costs 9associated with operating expenses, including prior years' 10costs. 11    Section 775. The amount of $500,000, or so much thereof 12that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 132025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 14in Article 52, Section 775 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 15is hereby reappropriated from the Fund For Illinois' Future to 16the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 17grant to the Irish American Heritage Center for capital 18improvements, including prior years' costs. 19    Section 780. The amount of $30,685,000, that was 20appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Department 21of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for administrative costs 22and grants associated with public safety and economic 23development in State fiscal year 2025 by Article 52, Section   HB3893- 69 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1780 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, or so much thereof that 2remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2025, 3is hereby appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 4the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for 5administrative costs and grants associated with public safety 6and economic development to the following named entities, in 7the approximate amounts below:8  Community Foundation of Northern Illinois...........500,0009  Carl R. Woese Institute for Genomic Biology at the 10University of Urbana-Champaign........................500,00011  United Way of Will County...........................500,00012  Plainfield Township.................................500,00013  Hoffman Estates Park District.......................500,00014  Mentoring Youth Through Technology..................500,00015  Village of Steger...................................500,00016  Flowers Fitness.....................................500,00017  Evanston Community Foundation.......................500,00018  Oak Lawn Regional Emergency Communications Center...500,00019  Starved Rock Community Foundation...................500,00020  Chicago Park District...............................500,00021  APS Training Institute..............................500,00022    St. Clair County 23  Intergovernmental Grants Department.................500,00024  Village of Northbrook...............................500,00025  39th Ward Mayfair Library...........................500,00026  Community Foundation of the Fox River Valley........500,000  HB3893- 70 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  Village of Elmhurst.................................500,0002  Little City Foundation..............................500,0003  Village of Shorewood................................500,0004  Maywood Park District...............................500,0005  Welles (Gideon) Park................................500,0006  City of Decatur.....................................500,0007  City of Chicago for Ogden Park......................500,0008  Youth Conservation Corps (YCC)......................500,0009  City of Country Club Hills..........................500,00010  Des Plaines Police Department.......................500,00011  Brighton Park Neighborhood Council..................500,00012  Chicago Park District...............................500,00013  Rogers Park Business Alliance.......................500,000 14    Section 785. The amount of $39,960,000, that was 15appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Department 16of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for administrative costs 17and grants associated with public safety and economic 18development in State fiscal year 2025 by Article 52, Section 19785 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, or so much thereof that 20remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2025, 21is hereby appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 22the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for 23administrative costs and grants associated with public safety 24and economic development to the following named entities, in 25the approximate amounts below:  HB3893- 71 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  Mckinley Park Development Council...................250,0002  Glenwood Academy....................................250,0003  Lake County Sheriff's Office........................250,0004  Naperville Community Television (NCTV17)............250,0005  City of Urbana .....................................250,0006  Habitat for Humanity of Champaign County ...........250,0007  Champaign County Regional Planning Commission ......250,0008  Village of Western Springs..........................350,0009  Village of Hinsdale.................................375,00010  DuPage County Animal Shelter........................275,00011  City of Rock Island.................................100,00012  Western Illinois University.........................500,00013  Galesburg, Museums, Inc. ...........................200,00014  The Alexandria Foundation ..........................200,00015  Acclivus ...........................................200,00016  Harvey Small fry Wildcats ..........................400,00017  Harvey Small fry Wildcats...........................200,00018  The House Of James .................................200,00019  Village of New Lenox................................250,00020  City of Country Club Hills..........................250,00021  Village of Orland Hills.............................250,00022  Village of Richton Park.............................250,00023  Kane County States Atty...........................1,000,00024  Lake County Sheriff's Office .......................250,00025  Greater Waukegan Development Coalition (GWDC).......250,00026  TRECC Community Development Foundation..............200,000  HB3893- 72 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  FBRK Brands ........................................200,0002  Reach Community Development Corporation.............200,0003  Neighborhood Heros..................................200,0004  West Point School of Music..........................200,0005  Chicago Heights.....................................250,0006  Park Forest ........................................250,0007  Manhattan Park District ............................250,0008  Wilton Township ....................................250,0009  Joliet Historical Museum ...........................250,00010  Fountaindale Public Library.........................250,00011  Village of Cresthill Police Department..............250,00012  Plainfield Township.................................250,00013  Old Irving Park Association.........................250,00014  School District 63..................................250,00015  Village of La Grange..............................1,000,00016  United Way of Rock River Valley.....................300,00017  United Way of Rock River Valley.....................700,00018  Mechanista..........................................250,00019  School Distirct 186.................................250,00020  Route History ......................................250,00021  Laborers Disaster Response Team ....................250,00022  Southwest Suburban Immigrant Project................250,00023  DuPage Township Center Food Pantry..................250,00024  South Asian American Chamber of Commerce............250,00025  Village of Arlington Heights........................250,00026  Strengthening Provisos Youth........................500,000  HB3893- 73 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  New Landmark Community Development Corp.............500,0002  Freedom Land Community Partners, Inc................500,0003  Habilitative Systems................................400,0004  The Answer Inc......................................500,0005  True To Life Foundation ............................250,0006  Rosemoor Community Association......................100,0007  West Chesterfield Community Association.............250,0008  Hegewisch Business Association......................250,0009  Chatham Business Association........................250,00010  Southeast Chicago Chamber of Commerce ..............250,00011  Mu Delta Lambda Charitable Foundation...............250,00012  AKArama Foundation Inc..............................100,00013  D'ESTEE INC.........................................100,00014  Calumet Area Industrial Commission..................100,00015  District Outreach Initiatives.......................500,00016  Moving our Youth Ahead .............................150,00017  Chicago Park District - West Chatham................250,00018  Lake Effect Community Development ..................250,00019  TCA Health .........................................250,00020  West Chatham Improvement Association................100,00021  Chesterfield Community Council .....................150,00022  South Deering ......................................100,00023  Chicago Park District - Tuley Park .................250,00024  Chicago Park District - Avalon Park ................250,00025  Prevention Partnership..............................100,00026  Illinois Association of Infant Mental Health........260,000  HB3893- 74 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  Austin Childcare Providers Network..................300,0002  Infant Welfare Society..............................400,0003  New Moms............................................500,0004  Sarah's Inn.........................................250,0005  Beyond Hunger.......................................500,0006  Housing Forward.....................................500,0007  West Cook YMCA......................................200,0008  Wonder Works Museum.................................100,0009  Hephzibah...........................................500,00010  New Life Centers....................................750,000 11  Mujeres Latinas en Accion ..........................250,000 12  Howard Brown Health ................................300,000 13  Florence Heller JCC.................................150,000 14  City of Springfield...............................1,300,000 15  Lawndale Christian Legal Center...................1,500,000 16  Chicago Architecture Biennial.......................150,000 17  Garfield Park Conservatory Alliance.................200,000 18  AllenForce ....................................... 300,000  19  League of Chicago Theaters .........................500,000 20  Trilogy .......................................... 500,000  21  Chicago Federation of Labor.........................500,000 22  Bensenville Community Public Library................200,000 23  River Grove Public Library District.................200,000 24  AAR Rockford......................................1,500,000 25  SkillsUSA Illinois................................1,000,000 26  Village of Bellwood.................................375,000   HB3893- 75 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1  SD 89 Educaiton Foundation..........................375,000 2  Aurora Regional Hispanic Chamber ...................250,000 3  Small Business Development Center of Aurora.........250,000 4  Joliet Latino Economic Development Association......250,000 5  Economic Strategy Development Corporation...........250,000 6  Little Village Chamber of Commerce..................250,000 7  Puerto Rican Cultural Center........................250,000 8  Albany Park/North River Commission..................250,000 9  Belmont Central Chamber.............................250,000 10  Northwest Community Development Center..............250,000 11  Logan Square Chamber of Commerce....................250,000 12  Wicker Park Chamber of Commerce.....................250,000 13  Melrose Park Chamber of Commerce ...................150,000 14  Northwest Hispanic Chamber of Commerce..............150,000 15  Greater Southwest Development Corporation...........200,000 16  Midway Chamber of Commerce..........................250,000 17  Illinois Resource Center..........................1,000,000 18  Latino Worker Safety Center.........................500,000 19    Section 805. The sum of $3,000,000, that was appropriated 20from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 21and Economic Opportunity for costs associated with contingent 22and operational expenses in State fiscal year 2025 by Article 2352, Section 805 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, or so much 24thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 25June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for   HB3893- 76 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 2Opportunity for a grant to the City of Granite City for costs 3associated with contingent and operational expenses. 4    Section 810. The sum of $2,000,000, that was appropriated 5from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 6and Economic Opportunity for costs associated with contingent 7and operational expenses in State fiscal year 2025 by Article 852, Section 810 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, or so much 9thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 10June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for 11Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 12Opportunity for a grant to the City of Collinsville for costs 13associated with contingent and operational expenses. 14    Section 815. The sum of $60,000, that was appropriated 15from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 16and Economic Opportunity for costs associated with contingent 17and operational expenses in State fiscal year 2025 by Article 1852, Section 815 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, or so much 19thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 20June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for 21Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 22Opportunity for a grant to the Edwardsville Art Center for 23costs associated with contingent and operational expenses.   HB3893- 77 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1    Section 820. The sum of $2,500,000, that was appropriated 2from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 3and Economic Opportunity for costs associated with contingent 4and operational expenses in State fiscal year 2025 by Article 552, Section 820 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, or so much 6thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 7June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for 8Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 9Opportunity for a grant to the DuSable Black History Museum 10and Education Center for costs associated with contingent and 11operational expenses. 12    Section 825. The sum of $1,235,000, that was appropriated 13from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 14and Economic Opportunity for costs associated with the 15Coalition to Stop CPKC in State fiscal year 2025 by Article 52, 16Section 825 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, or so much 17thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 18June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for 19Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 20Opportunity for a grant to Itasca for costs associated with 21the Coalition to Stop CPKC. 22    Section 830. The sum of $100,000, that was appropriated 23from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 24and Economic Opportunity for costs associated with contingent   HB3893- 78 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1and operational expenses in State fiscal year 2025 by Article 252, Section 830 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, or so much 3thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 4June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for 5Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 6Opportunity for a grant to Quad City Regional Development Film 7Office for costs associated with contingent and ordinary 8expenses. 9    Section 835. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 12for deposit into the Workforce, Technology, and Economic 13Development Fund for all costs and expenses associated with 14leveraging federal awards and opportunities for economic 15development purposes. 16    Section 840. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the Workforce, 18Technology, and Economic Development Fund to the Department of 19Commerce and Economic Opportunity for Grants, Contracts, and 20Administrative Expenses Associated with Leveraging Federal 21Awards and Opportunities, including prior year costs. 22    Section 845. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 23be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to   HB3893- 79 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for 2deposit into the Workforce, Technology, and Economic 3Development Fund for all costs and expenses associated with a 4marketing campaign to promote manufacturing, technology, and 5innovation in Illinois and increase the number of people 6entering high-demand manufacturing and technology occupations, 7including prior year costs. This may include costs and 8expenses associated with research to support marketing 9campaign efforts. 10    Section 850. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 11be necessary, is appropriated from the Workforce, Technology, 12and Economic Development Fund to the Department of Commerce 13and Economic Opportunity for all costs and expenses associated 14with a marketing campaign to promote manufacturing, 15technology, and innovation in Illinois and increase the number 16of people entering high-demand manufacturing and technology 17occupations, including prior year costs. This may include 18costs and expenses associated with research to support 19marketing campaign efforts. 20    Section 855. The sum of $17,000,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 22Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 23for deposit into the Workforce, Technology, and Economic 24Development Fund for all costs and expenses associated with   HB3893- 80 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1the Employer Training Investment Program and other business 2retention and attraction activities. 3    Section 860. The sum of $17,000,000, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, is appropriated from the Workforce, 5Technology, and Economic Development Fund to the Department of 6Commerce and Economic Opportunity for all costs and expenses 7associated with the Employer Training Investment Program and 8other business retention and attraction activities, including 9prior year costs. 10    Section 865. The sum of $25,000,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 12Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 13for deposit into the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund for an 14Enterprise Fund Grant Program and purposes authorized by 15subsection (b) of Section 4 of the Build Illinois Bond Act. 16    Section 870. The sum of $7,500,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 18Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 19for deposit into the Workforce, Technology, and Economic 20Development Fund for a Fast-Track Workforce Program. 21    Section 875. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the DCEO Projects Fund   HB3893- 81 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for 2Grants, Contracts, and Administrative expenses, including 3technical & financial assistance for qualifying entities, for 4costs associated with reducing food insecurity in urban and 5rural areas throughout Illinois 6ARTICLE 27    Section 15. The sum of $258,503, or so much thereof as may 8be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 9on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore made for 10such purpose in Article 130, Section 15 of Public Act 11103-0589, as amended is reappropriated from the State 12Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 13Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for general 14administrative and contingent costs associated with 15implementing programs funded, including but not limited to, by 16Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and any 17associated federal guidance, including prior years' costs. 18    Section 25. The amount of $1,946,166, or so much thereof 19as may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 20business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 21made for such purpose in Article 130, Section 25 of Public Act 22103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 23Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the   HB3893- 82 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants, 2contracts, and operational costs associated with the Tourism 3Attraction Development Grant Program Pursuant to 20 ILCS 4665/8a(2). 5    Section 30. The amount of $33,088,249, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 7business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 8made for such purpose in Article 130, Section 30 of Public Act 9103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 10Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 11Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants, 12contracts, and operational costs associated with the 13development and implementation of Job Training and Workforce 14Recovery programs pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/605-415, including 15costs related to the implementation of equity and access 16workforce commission recommendations. 17    Section 35. The amount of $4,084,828, or so much thereof 18as may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 19business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 20made for such purpose in Article 130, Section 35 of Public Act 21103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated to the Department of 22Commerce and Economic Opportunity from the State Coronavirus 23Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund for grants and awards for 24technical assistance, business support services and outreach,   HB3893- 83 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1including but not limited to investing in Community 2Navigators, targeted business support services for industries 3heavily impacted by COVID-19 and businesses in 4disproportionately impacted areas, and supporting increased 5entrepreneurial assistance efforts statewide, including prior 6years' costs. 7    Section 40. The sum of $20,471,663, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 9business on June 30, 2025, from and appropriation heretofore 10made from such purpose in Article 130, Section 40 of Public Act 11103-0589, as amended is reappropriated to the Department of 12Commerce and Economic Opportunity from the State Coronavirus 13Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund for grants, awards, and 14contingent costs associated with implementing the Research in 15Illinois to Spur Economic Recovery (RISE) program. 16    Section 50. The sum of $39,186,609, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 18business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 19made for such purpose in Article 130, Section 50 of Public Act 20103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 21Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 22Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for the 23purpose of making grants, contracts, and loans under the 24American Rescue Plan Capital Assets (ARPCAP) Program,   HB3893- 84 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1including prior incurred costs. 2    Section 60. The sum of $234,357, or so much thereof as may 3be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 4on June 30, 2024, from an appropriation heretofore made for 5such purpose in Article 130, Section 60 of Public Act 6103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 7Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 8Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 9the Katherine Dunham Museum in East St. Louis, including but 10not limited to, for purposes permitted by Section 9901 of the 11American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and related federal guidance, 12including prior years' costs. 13    Section 65. The sum of $255,000, or so much thereof as may 14be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 15on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore made from 16such purpose in Article 130, Section 65 of Public Act 17103-0589, as amended is reappropriated from the State 18Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 19Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 20the House of Miles Davis Museum in East St. Louis, including 21but not limited to, for purposes permitted by Section 9901 of 22the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and related federal 23guidance, including prior years' costs.   HB3893- 85 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1    Section 75. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 3business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 4made for such purpose in Article 130, Section 75 of Public Act 5103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 6Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 7Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 8the African-American Family Commission, including but not 9limited to, for purposes permitted by Section 9901 of the 10American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and related federal guidance, 11including prior years' costs. 12    Section 80. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 14business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 15made for such purpose in Article 130, Section 80 of Public Act 16103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 17Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 18Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 19the Latino Family Commission, including but not limited to, 20for purposes permitted by Section 9901 of the American Rescue 21Plan Act of 2021 and related federal guidance, including prior 22years' costs. 23    Section 85. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much thereof as 24may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of   HB3893- 86 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 2made for such purpose in Article 130, Section 85 of Public Act 3103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 4Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 5Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 6the Asian American Family Commission, including but not 7limited to, for purposes permitted by Section 9901 of the 8American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and related federal guidance, 9including prior years' costs. 10    Section 90. The sum of $172,618, or so much thereof as may 11be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 12on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore made for 13such purpose in Article 130, Section 90 of Public Act 14103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 15Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 16Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 17the STEAM Genius NFP for training and employment development 18for job training, including but not limited to, for purposes 19permitted by Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 202021 and related federal guidance, including prior years' 21costs. 22    Section 95. The sum of $1,800,000, or so much thereof as 23may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 24business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore   HB3893- 87 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1made for such purpose in Article 130, Section 95 of Public Act 2103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 3Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 4Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 5Lake Effect Community Development, including but not limited 6to, for purposes permitted by Section 9901 of the American 7Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and related federal guidance, 8including prior years' costs. 9    Section 105. The sum of $450,000, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 11on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore made for 12such purpose in Article 130, Section 105 of Public Act 13103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 14Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 15Department Of Commerce And Economic Opportunity for a grant to 16the Peoria Chamber of Commerce, including but not limited to, 17for purposes permitted by Section 9901 of the American Rescue 18Plan Act of 2021 and related federal guidance, including prior 19years' costs. 20    Section 110. The sum of $6,000,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 22business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 23made for such purpose in Article 130, Section 110 of Public Act 24103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State   HB3893- 88 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 2Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 3the City of Cahokia Heights, including but not limited to, for 4purposes permitted by Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan 5Act of 2021 and related federal guidance, including prior 6years' costs. 7    Section 115. The sum of $5,772,471, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 9business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 10made for such purpose in Article 130, Section 115 of Public Act 11103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 12Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 13Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grants, 14contracts and operational costs associated with the Tourism 15Attraction Development Grant Programs pursuant to 20 ILCS 16665/8a (2), including but not limited to, for purposes 17permitted by Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 182021 and related federal guidance, including prior years' 19costs. 20    Section 120. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 22business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 23made for such purpose in Article 130, Section 120 of Public Act 24103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State   HB3893- 89 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 2Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants to 3support state-designated cultural districts as defined by 4Public Act 102-0628, including but not limited to, for 5purposes allowed by Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan 6Act of 2021 and any associated federal guidance, including 7prior years' costs. 8    Section 125. The sum of $2,883,402, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 10business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 11made for such purpose in Article 130, Section 125 of Public Act 12103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 13Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 14Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants, 15contracts, and operational costs associated with the Tourism 16Attraction Development Grant Program Pursuant to 20 ILCS 17665/8a(2), including prior years' costs. 18    Section 140. The sum of $20,000,000, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 20business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 21made for such purpose in Article 130, Section 140 of Public Act 22103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 23Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 24Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for the   HB3893- 90 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1purpose of making grants, contracts, and loans under the 2American Rescue Plan Capital Assets (ARPCAP) Program, 3including prior incurred costs. 4    Section 145. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 6business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 7made for such purpose in Article 130, Section 145 of Public Act 8103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 9Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 10Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants, 11contracts, and operational costs associated with the 12development and implementation of Job Training and Workforce 13Recovery programs pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/605-415, including 14prior years' costs. 15    Section 150. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 17business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 18made for such purpose in Article 130, Section 150 of Public Act 19103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 20Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 21Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for ordinary 22and contingent expenses of Carter Temple Community Development 23Corporation, including but not limited to, for purposes 24allowed by Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021   HB3893- 91 -OMB104 00013 CMA 10013 b1and any associated federal guidance, including prior years' 2costs. 3    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 42025.